Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2015.01
Questionnaire, defined.

Questionnaire means a screening tool administered by a licensed health care professional to detect perinatal mental health disorders, such as the Edinburgh Postnatal Depression Scale, the Postpartum Depression Screening Scale, the Beck Depression Inventory, the Patient Health Questionnaire, or other validated screening methods.

Laws 2022, LB905, § 14.